Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,111
Violation; criminal penalty.

Any person who violates the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act or rules, regulations, or orders issued pursuant to the act shall upon conviction be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 34.